Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Day of Prayer Act”.


B. The Legislature finds that:


1. The National Day of Prayer is a long-standing tradition


observed annually on the first Thursday in May, as established by


joint resolution of the United States Congress in 1952 and amended


in 1988;



Req. No. 3523 Page 1


2. The President of the United States has issued an annual


proclamation designating the first Thursday in May as the National


Day of Prayer, calling upon Americans of all faiths and backgrounds


to engage in voluntary prayer, meditation, or reflection;


3. Prayer and spiritual reflection have played a significant


role in the history and culture of this state and the United States


since their founding; and


4. This state has a compelling interest in acknowledging and


preserving its historical and cultural heritage while respecting the


religious freedom of all citizens.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 90.31 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The first Thursday in May is hereby designated as the


“Oklahoma Day of Prayer”.


B. The Governor shall annually issue a proclamation:


1. Recognizing the Oklahoma Day of Prayer;


2. Encouraging citizens, consistent with their individual


beliefs, to engage in prayer, meditation, or personal reflection on


that day;


3. Calling for voluntary participation by residents, community


organizations, and faith-based groups in observances that respect


the diversity of religious expression in this state; and



Req. No. 3523 Page 2


4. Inviting local governments, schools, and civic organizations


to acknowledge the day in a manner consistent with the First


Amendment to the United States Constitution.


C. Participation in any Oklahoma Day of Prayer observance shall


be entirely voluntary. No state agency, political subdivision,


public school, or public institution shall compel any person to


participate in religious exercise or penalize any person for


choosing not to participate.


D. Nothing in this act shall be construed to:


1. Endorse or establish any religion;


2. Prohibit or restrict private religious expression; or


3. Require the expenditure of public funds beyond the issuance


of the Governor’s proclamation and minimal administrative costs.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3523 MSBB 1/14/2026 2:37:52 PM









Req. No. 3523 Page 3